Utah statutes.
78B-8-403.   Confidentiality -- Disclosure -- Penalty.
Any person or entity entitled to receive confidential information under this
chapter, other than the individual tested and identified in the information,
who violates the provisions of this chapter by releasing or making public that
confidential information, or by otherwise breaching the confidentiality
requirements of this chapter, is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.
